Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-102] Definitions. In
this chapter:

"Abandoned" means left without
provision for reasonable and necessary care or supervision.

"Child" means an individual who has
not attained eighteen years of age.

"Child-custody determination" means a
judgment, decree, or other order of a court providing for legal custody,
physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child. The term includes a
permanent, temporary, initial, and modification order. The term does not
include an order relating to child support or other monetary obligation of an
individual.

"Child-custody proceeding" means a
proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect
to a child is an issue. The term includes a proceeding for divorce,
separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of
parental rights, and protection from domestic violence, in which the issue may
appear. The term does not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency,
contractual emancipation, or enforcement under part III.

"Commencement" means the filing of
the first pleading in a child-custody proceeding.

"Court" means an entity authorized
under the law of a state to establish, enforce, or modify a child-custody
determination.

"Home state" means the state in which
a child lived with a parent or a person acting as a parent for a period of at
least six consecutive months immediately before the commencement of a
child-custody proceeding. In the case of a child less than six months of age,
the term means the state in which the child lived from birth with any of the
persons mentioned. A period of temporary absence of any of the mentioned
persons is part of the period.

"Initial determination" means the
first child-custody determination concerning a particular child.

"Issuing court" means the court that
makes a child-custody determination for which enforcement is sought under this
chapter.

"Issuing state" means the state in
which a child-custody determination is made.

"Modification" means a child-custody
determination that changes, replaces, supersedes, or is otherwise made after a
previous determination concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by
the court that made the previous determination.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"Person acting as a parent" means a
person, other than a parent, who:

(1) Has physical custody of the child or has had
physical custody for a period of six consecutive months, including any
temporary absence, within one year immediately before the commencement of a
child-custody proceeding; and

(2) Has been awarded legal custody by a court or
claims a right to legal custody under the law of this State.

"Physical custody" means the physical
care and supervision of a child.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States.

"Sibling" refers to full-blood
brothers and sisters, and step and half blood siblings.

"Tribe" means an Indian tribe or
band, or Alaskan Native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally
acknowledged by a state.

"Warrant" means an order issued by a
court authorizing law enforcement officers to take physical custody of a child.
[L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next